Wyoming statutes. Title 1 Code of Civil Procedure
Chapter 37 Declaratory Judgments
§ 1-37-113.
Parties generally; proceedings involving validity of ordinance or
franchise.

When declaratory relief
is sought, all persons shall be made parties who have or claim any
interest which would be affected by the declaration, and no declaration
shall prejudice the rights of persons not parties to the proceeding.
In any proceeding which involves the validity of a municipal ordinance
or franchise, the municipality shall be made a party and may be heard.
If the statute, ordinance or franchise is alleged to be unconstitutional,
the attorney general of the state shall be served with a copy of the
proceeding and may be heard.

History.

Laws 1923, ch. 50, § 11; R.S. 1931, § 89-2411; C.S. 1945, § 3-5811; W.S. 1957, § 1-1061; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 1-38-112.

Intent and purpose of section. —

See Tobin v. Pursel, 539 P.2d 361,

1975 Wyo. LEXIS 159

(Wyo. 1975).

Requirements mandatory. —

The requirements of this section, directing that the attorney general shall be “served with a copy of the proceeding” and “be entitled to be heard,” are mandatory and go to the jurisdiction of the court, and failure to comply with the mandates renders any lower court order void. Tobin v. Pursel, 539 P.2d 361,

1975 Wyo. LEXIS 159

(Wyo. 1975).

Attorney general's duty. —

The attorney general, being the chief legal officer of the state, has a duty to protect the interests and the welfare of the people in declaratory judgment actions where statutory constitutional questions are an issue. Tobin v. Pursel, 539 P.2d 361,

1975 Wyo. LEXIS 159

(Wyo. 1975).

Joinder. —

Under this section joinder of parties is permissible when there is community of interest in questions of fact and law. Holly Sugar Corp. v. Fritzler, 42 Wyo. 446, 296 P. 206,

1931 Wyo. LEXIS 50

(Wyo. 1931).

Omitted parties. —

Declaratory judgment action seeking to invalidate city's sale of realty, to which persons entitled to reimbursement for improvements were not made parties, could not prejudice the latters' rights. Quackenbush v. Cheyenne, 52 Wyo. 146, 70 P.2d 577,

1937 Wyo. LEXIS 40

(Wyo. 1937).

district court properly granted a city's motion for summary judgment in an owner's declaratory judgment action because the owner did not seek administrative review of the city's approval of the neighbors' new construction or allege any vagueness or uncertainty in the city ordinance at issue, the existing garage on the neighbors' property was a grandfathered structure, the ordinance allowed a new building to retain the replaced building's grandfathered status as long as it was within the grandfathered building's footprint and allowed work other than restoration, and the neighbors' rights would not be prejudiced by the owner's failure to name them as parties. Sikora v. City of Rawlins, 2017 WY 55, 394 P.3d 472,

2017 Wyo. LEXIS 55

(Wyo. 2017).

Parties held indispensable. —

In an action by an oil refiner for declaration that its plan to impound and recycle effluent water, being the water, purchased from a city, which remained after use in its refinery process, was not subject to the jurisdiction and control of the state engineer and the Wyoming state board of control, and that the proposed use did not infringe on any rights of downstream water appropriators, the state board of control and the city were necessary and indispensable parties to the action, and the cause should not proceed without their joinder. State by Christopulos v. Husky Oil Co., 575 P.2d 262,

1978 Wyo. LEXIS 268

(Wyo. 1978).

Appearance waives personal jurisdiction. —

The individual plaintiffs submitted to the court's jurisdiction by voluntarily appearing and bringing their original action in that court. They, therefore, waived any objection to personal jurisdiction and the court appropriately exercised specific personal jurisdiction over those officers and directors with respect to the counterclaim following the dismissal of the complaint under Rule 37, W.R.C.P. Global Shipping & Trading, Ltd. v. Verkhnesaldincky Metallurgic Co., 892 P.2d 143,

1995 Wyo. LEXIS 50

(Wyo. 1995).

In suit over protective covenant, seller/developer's representations
irrelevant. —

The court properly found that a protective covenant entitled lot owners to use a right-of-way unobstructed by a second lot owner's fence. Extrinsic evidence concerning allegedly false oral representations made to the second lot owner by the seller/developer were neither relevant nor informative to a determination of the parties' rights vis-a-vis the duly filed covenant which created the access interest as a title record document. Revelle v. Schultz, 759 P.2d 1255,

1988 Wyo. LEXIS 113

(Wyo. 1988).

Adjoining landowners. —

In an action to determine the rights of landowners along a public access fishing easement, adjoining landowners who did not join the action as plaintiffs were properly joined as third-party defendants since the third party defendants' interests might have been impaired or impeded by a judgment rendered in their absence. Lamb v. Wyoming Game & Fish Comm'n, 985 P.2d 433,

1999 Wyo. LEXIS 119

(Wyo. 1999), reh'g denied,

1999 Wyo. LEXIS 142

(Wyo. Aug. 31, 1999).

Applied

in

Washakie County Sch. Dist. v. Herschler, 606 P.2d 310,

1980 Wyo. LEXIS 227

(Wyo. 1980); Baessler v. Freier, 2011 WY 125, 258 P.3d 720,

2011 Wyo. LEXIS 128

(Aug. 26, 2011).

Quoted

in

In re Estate of Lonquest, 526 P.2d 994,

1974 Wyo. LEXIS 235

(Wyo. 1974); Ririe v. Board of Trustees, 674 P.2d 214,

1983 Wyo. LEXIS 391

(Wyo. 1983); Morris v. Farmers Ins. Exch., 771 P.2d 1206,

1989 Wyo. LEXIS 90

(Wyo. 1989).

Cited

in

Frank v. City of Cody, 572 P.2d 1106,

1977 Wyo. LEXIS 304

(Wyo. 1977).

Law reviews. —

For article, “Supreme Court Jurisdiction and the Wyoming Constitution: Justice v. Judicial Restraint,” see XX Land & Water L. Rev. 159 (1985).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Construction, application and effect of § 11 of the Uniform Declaratory Judgments Act that all persons who have or claim any interest which would be affected by the declaration shall be made parties, 71 ALR2d 723.

§ 1-37-114.
Construction of chapter.

The Uniform Declaratory
Judgments Act is remedial. Its purpose is to settle and to afford
relief from uncertainty and insecurity with respect to legal relations,
and is to be liberally construed and administered.

History.

Laws 1923, ch. 50, § 12; R.S. 1931, § 89-2412; C.S. 1945, § 3-5812; W.S. 1957, § 1-1062; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 1-38-113.

Uniform Declaratory Judgments Act. —

See §

1-37-101

and notes thereto.

In general. —

The Wyoming courts do not interpret the Declaratory Judgment Act in a narrow or technical sense, and there remains the prerequisite that the party seeking declaratory relief present the court with an actual controversy. Wyo. Cmty. College Comm'n v. Casper Cmty. College Dist., 2001 WY 86, 31 P.3d 1242,

2001 Wyo. LEXIS 106

(Wyo. 2001).

A declaratory judgment action cannot substitute for an appeal. Simon v. Teton Bd. of Realtors, 4 P.3d 197,

2000 Wyo. LEXIS 91

(Wyo. 2000).

Trial court properly dismissed property owners'
declaratory judgment action against the State Engineer and the Board of Control because the action was not justiciable; even if the case presented a matter of great public importance, the Uniform Declaratory Judgments Act, Wyo. Stat. Ann. §§

1-37-101

through

1-37-115

, did not extend the jurisdiction of the district court, and the property owners failed to show that any relief would have a practical effect on them.
William F. West Ranch, LLC v. Tyrrell, 2009 WY 62, 206 P.3d 722,

2009 Wyo. LEXIS 65

(Wyo. 2009).

Employee was entitled to a declaration of her rights under the State Employees'
and Officials'
Group Plan (Group Plan) where, pursuant to the medical management provisions, she did not have the right to bring a legal action to recover under the Group Plan until she completed the required to level appeals process.
State ex rel. Arnold v. Ommen, 2009 WY 24, 201 P.3d 1127,

2009 Wyo. LEXIS 25

(Wyo. 2009).

City had failed to assert a justiciable controversy under the Uniform Declaratory Judgments Act regarding its use of revenues from the sale of electricity where an assertion that a citizens group had taken contrary positions regarding the statutes at issue was insufficient to allege a tangible interest that had been harmed. City of Torrington v. Smith, 2016 WY 126, 386 P.3d 336,

2016 Wyo. LEXIS 140

(Wyo. 2016).

Purpose may be carried out in actions not expressly based on
chapter. —

The purpose of this chapter, as set forth in this section, may be carried out in actions not expressly based on the Declaratory Judgments Act. Ohio Oil Co. v. Wyoming Agency, 63 Wyo. 187, 179 P.2d 773,

1947 Wyo. LEXIS 9

(Wyo. 1947); Poling v. North Am. Life & Casualty Co., 593 P.2d 568,

1979 Wyo. LEXIS 398

(Wyo. 1979).

Actions of board of county commissioners. —

Review of board of county commissioners' parliamentary procedural decision that a tie vote constituted no action and that it could vote again involved the board's procedures and its authority to engage in the actions at issue, which presented questions of law subject to a declaratory judgment action. Hirschfield v. Board of County Comm'rs, 944 P.2d 1139,

1997 Wyo. LEXIS 119

(Wyo. 1997).

Existence of another adequate remedy will not, of itself, preclude declaratory judgment relief.

Rocky Mountain Oil & Gas Ass'n v. State, 645 P.2d 1163,

1982 Wyo. LEXIS 345

(Wyo. 1982).

Begrudging availability of the declaratory vehicle is inconsistent

with the act's expressed remedial tenor directed to the elimination of uncertainty and insecurity and the settlement of controversy. Brimmer v. Thomson, 521 P.2d 574,

1974 Wyo. LEXIS 197

(Wyo. 1974).

Administrative decisions. —

Ordinarily, a declaratory judgment action is not a substitute for an appeal from administrative decisions. If, however, such desired relief concerns the validity and construction of agency regulations, or if it concerns the constitutionality or interpretation of a statute upon which the administrative action is, or is to be, based, it should be entertained. Wyo. Cmty. College Comm'n v. Casper Cmty. College Dist., 2001 WY 86, 31 P.3d 1242,

2001 Wyo. LEXIS 106

(Wyo. 2001).

Under review of Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

1-37-109

, an owner of natural gas wells was properly granted declaratory judgment under Wyo. Stat. Ann. §§

1-37-103

,

1-37-108

, and this section of the Uniform Declaratory Judgment Act, finding that the Department of Revenue had no authority to change the valuation methodology for production taxes and royalties without complying with the notice provisions of Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 39-14-203(b). Exhaustion of remedies was not required, and the primary jurisdiction doctrine did not apply because only questions of law were presented.
Wyo. Dep't of Revenue v. Exxon Mobil Corp., 2007 WY 21, 150 P.3d 1216,

2007 Wyo. LEXIS 21

(Wyo. 2007).

Quiet title. —

An action to quiet title is essentially an action for declaratory relief. Morad v. Brown, 549 P.2d 312,

1976 Wyo. LEXIS 187

(Wyo. 1976).

Where the court disposed of the two main issues in the case before it, namely, that defendant's tax-based title was void and plaintiffs' legal title was proven, this in effect quieted title, but fell short of giving plaintiffs possession or a decree to that effect. Morad v. Brown, 549 P.2d 312,

1976 Wyo. LEXIS 187

(Wyo. 1976).

Construction of will. —

Under this act district courts have power, upon petition of any person interested, to determine any question of construction or validity arising under a will, to declare rights, status or other legal relations thereunder, and to determine any question arising in administration of an estate. Murrell v. Stock Growers' Nat'l Bank, 74 F.2d 827, 1934 U.S. App. LEXIS 4018 (10th Cir. Wyo. 1934).

Where declaratory action on insurance policy variance properly
brought. —

Where the plaintiff, in effect, assumed the facts necessary to permit her to seek a declaration that the variance between the certificate of insurance and the master insurance policy resulted in an ambiguity which entitled her to a construction that a suicide limitation was applicable for zero years, such an action appropriately could be brought under this chapter. Poling v. North Am. Life & Casualty Co., 593 P.2d 568,

1979 Wyo. LEXIS 398

(Wyo. 1979).

In an LLC, where withdrawing member did not voluntarily forfeit his equity interest

, where members did not contract for buyout and where statute did not require it, court did not require LLC or members to buy withdrawn LLC member's equity interest; remanded for trial court to define his retained LLC equity rights in the declaratory judgment action. Lieberman v. Wyoming.com LLC, 2004 WY 1, 82 P.3d 274,

2004 Wyo. LEXIS 1

(Wyo. 2004).

Exchange of school lands. —

A controversy over the constitutionality of exchanges of state lands without a public auction involved precisely the type of circumstance contemplated by the Uniform Declaratory Judgments Act, for (1) this controversy impacted many stakeholders, including state-school-land lessees, the beneficiaries of the funds generated by state school lands, the legislature which had adopted statutes authorizing exchanges, those members of the executive branch of state government whose responsibility was to steward the state school lands, and the public at large; and (2) as inevitable growth and development increased the pressure on Wyoming state lands, the need for certainty and clarity regarding this aspect of the management of state lands grew.Dir. of the Office of State Lands & Invs. v. Merbanco, Inc., 2003 WY 73, 70 P.3d 241,

2003 Wyo. LEXIS 91

(Wyo. 2003), reh'g denied,

2003 Wyo. LEXIS 105

(Wyo. July 10, 2003).

Stated in

Ultra Res., Inc. v. Hartman, 2015 WY 40, 2015 Wyo. LEXIS
45 (Mar. 19, 2015).

Applied

in

Washakie County Sch. Dist. v. Herschler, 606 P.2d 310,

1980 Wyo. LEXIS 227

(Wyo. 1980); Kurpjuweit v. Northwestern Dev. Co., 708 P.2d 39,

1985 Wyo. LEXIS 584

(Wyo. 1985); In re General Adjudication of All Rights to Use Water in Big Horn River Sys., 753 P.2d 76,

1988 Wyo. LEXIS 26

(Wyo. 1988); Cox v. City of Cheyenne, 2003 WY 146, 79 P.3d 500,

2003 Wyo. LEXIS 177

(Wyo. 2003); Best v. Best, 2015 WY 133,

2015 Wyo. LEXIS 150

(Sept. 30, 2015).

Quoted

in

West Tex. Utils. Co. v. Exxon Coal USA, Inc., 807 P.2d 932,

1991 Wyo. LEXIS 36

(Wyo. 1991); Reiman Corp. v. City of Cheyenne, 838 P.2d 1182,

1992 Wyo. LEXIS 148

(Wyo. 1992); Lieberman v. Wyoming.com LLC, 11 P.3d 353,

2000 Wyo. LEXIS 194

(Wyo. 2000).

Cited

in

Holly Sugar Corp. v. Fritzler, 42 Wyo. 446, 296 P. 206,

1931 Wyo. LEXIS 50

(1931); Snake River Brewing Co. v. Town of Jackson, 2002 WY 11, 39 P.3d 397,

2002 Wyo. LEXIS 12

(Wyo. 2002); Quinn Revocable Trust v. SRW, Inc., 2004 WY 65, 91 P.3d 146,

2004 Wyo. LEXIS 80

(2004).

Law reviews. —

For comment, “Wyoming's Uniform Declaratory Judgments Act: Statutory and Case Law Analysis,” see XVI Land & Water L. Rev. 243 (1981).

For article, “An Essay on Wyoming Constitutional Interpretation,” see XXI Land & Water L. Rev. 527 (1986).

§ 1-37-115.
Provisions severable.

The provisions of the
Uniform Declaratory Judgments Act are independent and severable. The
invalidity of one (1) provision shall not affect or render the remainder
of the act invalid.

History.

Laws 1923, ch. 50, § 14; R.S. 1931, § 89-2414; C.S. 1945, § 3-5814; W.S. 1957, § 1-1063; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 1-38-114.

Uniform Declaratory Judgments Act. —

See §

1-37-101

and notes thereto.

Cited in

Ultra Res., Inc. v. Hartman, 2015 WY 40, 2015 Wyo. LEXIS
45 (Mar. 19, 2015); Inman v. Inman (In re Estate of Inman), 2016 WY 101, 382 P.3d 67,

2016 Wyo. LEXIS 112

(Wyo. 2016).